Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,206
International Registration Plan Act; violations; penalty.

Any person, firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation which violates any provision of the International Registration Plan Act is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 206.